Hawaii statutes.
§513-1 Labor organizations. Labor
organizations, as defined in the federal Labor Management Relations Act or in
the Hawaii Employment Relations Act, may take, hold, transfer, and convey
property, real, personal, or mixed, and in all other wise deal with the
property, in the name of and as though the labor organization were a separate
natural person; provided that the labor organization shall act by and through
its duly authorized officers or agents. [L 1965, c 272, §1; Supp, §345E-1; HRS
§513-1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next